Utah statutes.
10-3-1001.   Subordinates in police, health, and fire departments to be appointed from list.

Subject to the rules and regulations of the civil service commission, the head of the police and fire departments of each first and second class city that establishes a civil service commission and the health officer in each first class city that establishes a civil service commission shall, from the classified civil service list furnished by the civil service commission and by and with the advice and consent of the city legislative body:

(1)  appoint all subordinate officers, employees, members, or agents in the department; and

(2)  fill vacancies in the positions listed in Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 178, 2001 General Session

